California statutes. Vehicle Code
For purposes of this division, the term “commercial motor vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, or any vehicle listed in Section 34500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 58.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.6.

(a) For purposes of this division, an agricultural vehicle is a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,000 pounds or less if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of
 an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.

(2) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations when operating in commerce.

(3) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.

(4) The towing vehicle has a gross weight rating of 16,000 pounds or less.

(5) Is used solely in intrastate commerce.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.7.

(a) Subject to Section 34500, motor carriers, drivers, and vehicles shall comply with the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations in Parts 385, 392, 393, 396, and 397 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Daily Vehicle Inspection Reports are required for intrastate drivers and motor carriers pursuant to Section 1215 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 219, Sec. 10.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.

(a) (1) The department shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations that, in the judgment of the department, are designed to promote the safe operation of vehicles described in Section 34500, regarding, but not limited to, controlled substances and alcohol testing of drivers by motor carriers, hours of service of drivers, equipment, fuel containers, fueling operations, inspection, maintenance, recordkeeping, accident reports, and drawbridges. The rules and regulations shall not, however, be applicable to schoolbuses, which shall be subject to rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 34501.5.

The rules and regulations shall exempt local law enforcement agencies, within a
 single county, engaged in the transportation of inmates or prisoners when those agencies maintain other motor vehicle operations records which furnish hours of service information on drivers which are in substantial compliance with the rules and regulations. This exemption does not apply to any local law enforcement agency engaged in the transportation of inmates or prisoners outside the county in which the agency is located, if that agency would otherwise be required, by existing law, to maintain driving logs.

(2) The department may adopt rules and regulations relating to commercial vehicle safety inspection and out-of-service criteria. In adopting the rules and regulations, the commissioner may consider the commercial vehicle safety inspection and out-of-service criteria adopted by organizations such as the Commercial Vehicle Safety
 Alliance, other intergovernmental safety group, or the United States Department of Transportation. The commissioner may provide departmental representatives to that alliance or other organization for the purpose of promoting the continued improvement and refinement of compatible nationwide commercial vehicle safety inspection and out-of-service criteria.

(3) The commissioner shall appoint a committee of 15 members, consisting of representatives of industry subject to the regulations to be adopted pursuant to this section, to act in an advisory capacity to the department, and the department shall cooperate and confer with the advisory committee so appointed. The commissioner shall appoint a separate committee to advise the department on rules and regulations concerning wheelchair lifts for installation and use on buses, consisting of
 persons who use the wheelchair lifts, representatives of transit districts, representatives of designers or manufacturers of wheelchairs and wheelchair lifts, and representatives of the Department of Transportation.

(4) The department may inspect any vehicles in maintenance facilities or terminals, as well as any records relating to the dispatch of vehicles or drivers, and the pay of drivers, to ensure compliance with this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) The department, using the definitions adopted pursuant to Section 2402.7, shall adopt regulations for the transportation of hazardous materials in this state, except the transportation of materials that are subject to other provisions of this code, that the department determines are
 reasonably necessary to ensure the safety of persons and property using the highways. The regulations may include provisions governing the filling, marking, packing, labeling, and assembly of, and containers that may be used for, hazardous materials shipments, and the manner by which the shipper attests that the shipments are correctly identified and in proper condition for transport.

(2) (A) The regulations adopted under this section for vehicles engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce shall establish hazardous materials requirements that are consistent with the hazardous materials regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation in Chapter I of, and Part 397 of Subchapter B of Chapter III of, Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) If a carrier not subject to federal jurisdiction finds a regulation adopted pursuant to this section to be unnecessarily burdensome or impracticable, the carrier may apply to the department, at no cost, for an alternate method of compliance.

(3) Regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision do not apply to the following:

(A) The transportation of explosives in an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 165, when operated by a peace officer, as defined in Sections 830.1 and 830.2 of the Penal Code, under the following conditions:

(i) The transportation is necessary for tactical operations or explosives detection or removal duties.

(ii) Storage and security is in compliance with the applicable provisions of “ATV Federal Explosives Laws and Regulations,” published by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives.

(B) The transportation of seized fireworks by a public agency as authorized by Part 2 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 11 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) (1) At least once every 13 months, the department shall inspect every maintenance facility or terminal of any person who at any time operates any bus. If the bus operation includes more than 100 buses, the inspection shall be without prior notice.

(2) This subdivision does not preclude
 the department from conducting inspections of tour bus operations with fewer than 100 buses without prior notice. To the extent possible, the department shall conduct inspections without prior notice of any tour bus operation, including tour bus operations that have a history of noncompliance with safety laws or regulations, that have received unsatisfactory ratings, or that have had buses ordered out of service for safety violations.

(3) If a tour bus operator receives an unsatisfactory rating, the department shall conduct a followup inspection between 30 and 90 days after the initial inspection during which the unsatisfactory rating was received.

(d) The commissioner shall adopt and enforce regulations which will make the public or private users of any bus aware of the
 operator’s last safety rating.

(e) It is unlawful and constitutes a misdemeanor for any person to operate any bus without the inspections specified in subdivision (c) having been conducted.

(f) The department may adopt regulations restricting or
 prohibiting the movement of any vehicle from a maintenance facility or terminal if the vehicle is found in violation of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 20.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.1.

A manufacturer or distributor of wheelchair lifts for buses, schoolbuses, youth buses, and general public transit vehicles, regardless of capacity, shall, prior to the distribution of the wheelchair lift model in California, provide to the Department of the California Highway Patrol proof of certification from an independent laboratory or registered mechanical engineer of this state that the wheelchair lift model complies with the California and any federal law and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.2.

(a) The regulations adopted under Section 34501 for vehicles engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce shall establish hours-of-service regulations for drivers of those vehicles that are consistent with the hours-of-service regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation in Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations now exist or are hereafter amended.

(b) The regulations adopted under Section 34501 for vehicles engaged in intrastate commerce that are not transporting hazardous substances or hazardous waste, as those terms are defined by regulations in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations
 now exist or are hereafter amended, shall have the following exceptions:

(1) (A) The maximum driving time within a work period shall be 12 hours for a driver of a truck or truck tractor, except for a driver of a tank vehicle with a capacity of more than 500 gallons transporting flammable liquid, who shall not drive for more than 10 hours within a work period.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the regulations may authorize a driver to exceed the maximum driving time prescribed in subparagraph (A) and on-duty time prescribed in paragraph (2) during a state of emergency declared by the Governor when operating within the state to transport fuel, pursuant to a contract with this state or the United States, used for the purpose of refueling aircraft used in
 emergency-related activities, including fire suppression.

(2) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), a motor carrier shall not permit or require a driver to drive, nor shall a driver drive, for any period after having been on duty for 80 hours in any consecutive eight days.

(3) (A) A driver employed by an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 224.3 of that code, a gas corporation, as defined in Section 222 of that code, a telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of that code, a water corporation, as defined in Section 241 of that code, or a public water district as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code, is exempt from all
 hours-of-service regulations while operating a public utility or public water district vehicle.

(B) A driver hired directly as a contractor by an electrical corporation, a local publicly owned electric utility, a gas corporation, a telephone corporation, a water corporation, or a public water district, as those entities are defined in subparagraph (A), or as a subcontractor hired directly by the original contractor, is exempt from all hours-of-service regulations while operating a vehicle for the purpose of restoring utility service during an emergency on behalf of the entity that hired the original contractor.
 The driver shall maintain a driver’s record of duty status and shall keep a duplicate copy in their possession when driving a vehicle subject to this chapter. These records shall be presented immediately upon request by any authorized employee of the department, or any police officer or deputy sheriff.

(C) For purposes of subparagraph (B), “emergency” means a sudden, unexpected occurrence involving a clear and imminent danger, demanding immediate action to prevent or mitigate loss of, or damage to, life, health, property, or essential public services. “Unexpected occurrence” includes, but is not limited to, fires, floods, earthquakes or other soil or geologic movements, riots, accidents, inclement weather, natural disaster, sabotage, or other occurrence, whether natural or man-made, that interrupts the delivery of essential
 services, such as electricity, medical care, sewer, water, telecommunications, and telecommunication transmissions, or otherwise immediately threatens human life or public welfare.

(4) Any other exceptions applicable to drivers assigned to governmental fire suppression and prevention, as determined by the department.

(5) A driver employed by a law enforcement agency, as defined in Section 390.3(f)(2) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section now exists or is hereafter amended, during an emergency or to restore the public peace.

(c) The regulations adopted under Section 34501 for vehicles engaged in the transportation of farm products in intrastate commerce shall include all of the following
 provisions:

(1) A driver employed by an agricultural carrier, including a carrier holding a seasonal permit, or by a private carrier, when transporting farm products from the field to the first point of processing or packing, shall not drive for any period after having been on duty 16 hours or more following 8 consecutive hours off duty and shall not drive for any period after having been on duty for 112 hours in any consecutive eight-day period, except that a driver transporting special situation farm products from the field to the first point of processing or packing, or transporting livestock from pasture to pasture, may be permitted, during one period of not more than 28 consecutive days or a combination of two periods totaling not more than 28 days in a calendar year, to drive for not more than 12 hours during any workday of not more
 than 16 hours. A driver who thereby exceeds the driving time limits specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall maintain a driver’s record of duty status, and shall keep a duplicate copy in their possession when driving a vehicle subject to this chapter. These records shall be presented immediately upon request by any authorized employee of the department, or any police officer or deputy sheriff.

(2) Upon the request of the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, the commissioner may, for good cause, temporarily waive the maximum on-duty time limits applicable to any eight-day period when an emergency exists due to inclement weather, natural disaster, or an
 adverse economic condition that threatens to disrupt the orderly movement of farm products during harvest for the duration of the emergency. For purposes of this paragraph, an emergency does not include a strike or labor dispute.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Farm products” means every agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, or vegetable product of the soil, honey and beeswax, oilseeds, poultry, livestock, milk, or timber.

(B) “First point of processing or packing” means a location where farm products are dried, canned, extracted, fermented, distilled, frozen, ginned, eviscerated, pasteurized, packed, packaged, bottled, conditioned, or otherwise manufactured, processed,
 or preserved for distribution in wholesale or retail markets.

(C) “Special situation farm products” means fruit, tomatoes, sugar beets, grains, wine grapes, grape concentrate, cotton, or nuts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 417, Sec. 6.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.3.

(a) No motor carrier shall schedule a run or permit or require the operation of any motor vehicle subject to this division between points within a period of time which would do either of the following: 

(1) Necessitate the vehicle being operated at speeds greater than those prescribed by this code. 

(2) Require the driver of the vehicle to exceed the applicable maximum hours of service. 

(b) A logbook of a driver, which reflects a trip or
 trips between points within a period of time which would have necessitated excessive speed to complete, shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that the driver exceeded the lawful speed limit. 

(c) For a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a first offense is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), a second offense by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and a third or subsequent offense by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.4.

Any driver subject to the hours of service limitations and logbook requirements of this division, who is unable to produce upon request of a representative of the department any driver’s logbook or is only able to produce an incomplete driver’s log book for the prior 24-hour period, is rebuttably presumed to be in violation of the hours of service limitations in Sections 34501 and 34501.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1306, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.5.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations that, in the judgment of the department, are designed to promote the safe operation of vehicles described in Sections 39830 and 82321 of the Education Code and Sections 545 and 34500 of this code. The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall appoint a committee of 11 members to act in an advisory capacity when developing and adopting regulations affecting school pupil transportation buses and school pupil transportation operations. The advisory committee shall consist of 11 members appointed as follows:

(1) One member of the State Department
 of Education.

(2) One member of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) One member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(4) One member who is employed as a schoolbus driver.

(5) One member of the California Office of Traffic Safety in the Transportation Agency.

(6) Two members who are schoolbus contractors, one of whom shall be from an urban area of the state and one of whom shall be from a rural area of the state, as determined by the department.

(7) Two members who are representatives of school districts, one of whom shall be
 from an urban area of the state and one of whom shall be from a rural area of the state, as determined by the department.

(8) One professionally licensed member of the American Academy of Pediatrics.

(9) One member representing school pupil transportation operations other than schoolbus operations.

(b) The department shall cooperate and confer with the advisory committee appointed pursuant to this section prior to adopting rules or regulations affecting school pupil transportation buses and school pupil transportation operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 417, Sec. 7.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.6.

The governing board of a local educational agency that provides for the transportation of pupils shall adopt procedures that limit the operation of schoolbuses when atmospheric conditions reduce visibility on the roadway to 200 feet or less during regular home-to-school transportation service. Operational policies for school activity trips shall give schoolbus drivers discretionary authority to discontinue schoolbus operation if the driver determines that it is unsafe to continue operation because of reduced visibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 624, Sec. 9.   Effective September 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.7.

(a) Any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 34501 for the construction, testing, or certification of wheelchair lifts for installation and use on buses shall take into consideration the costs of implementing the regulations and shall be reviewed and brought up to date by the department annually.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1987.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 969, Sec. 4.   Section operative July 1, 1987, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.8.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall inspect every general public paratransit vehicle, as defined in Section 336, at least once each year to certify that its condition complies with all provisions of law, including being equipped with a fire extinguisher, first-aid kit, and three-point tie downs for transporting wheelchair passengers.

(b) On or after July 1, 1989, no person shall drive any general public paratransit vehicle unless there
 is displayed therein a certificate issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol stating that on a certain date, which shall be within 13 months of the date of operation, an authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol inspected the general public paratransit vehicle and found that on the date of inspection the general public paratransit vehicle complied with the applicable provisions of state law. The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall provide, by rule or regulation, for the issuance and display of distinctive inspection certificates.

(c) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall determine a fee and method of collection for the annual inspection of general public paratransit vehicles. The fee, established by regulation, shall be sufficient to cover the cost to the department for general public paratransit vehicle inspections. All fees received shall be deposited in the Motor
 Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

This section shall become operative January 1, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 683, Sec. 5.   Effective August 29, 1988.   Section is inoperative from August 29, 1988, until January 1, 1989, by its own provisions from this amendment.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.9.

(a) Nothing in this division or the regulations adopted under this division is intended to, or shall, affect the rate of payment of wages, including, but not limited to, regular, premium, or overtime rates, paid to any person whether for on-duty hours or driving hours or otherwise.

(b) Nothing in this division or the regulations adopted under this division is intended to, or shall, affect the regulations adopted pursuant to other provisions of law concerning the rate or rates of payment of wages by any other public agency, including, but not limited to, the Industrial
 Welfare Commission or the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.10.

The employer of any person required to keep log books, records of physical examination, and other driver records as may be required by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Motor Vehicles, or the State Department of Health Services, shall register with the Department of the California Highway Patrol the address where the log books and other records are available for inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1452, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1988.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.12.

(a) Vehicles and the operation thereof, subject to this section, are those described in subdivision (a), (b), (e), (f), (g), or (k) of Section 34500, except an agricultural vehicle as defined in Section 34500.6.

(b) It is unlawful for a motor carrier to operate any vehicle of a type described in subdivision (a) without identifying to the department all terminals, as defined in Section 34515, in this state where vehicles may be inspected by the department pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34501 and where vehicle inspection and maintenance records and driver records will be made available for inspection. Motor carriers shall make vehicles and records available for inspection upon request by an authorized representative of the department.
 If a motor carrier fails to provide vehicles and records, an unsatisfactory terminal rating shall be issued by the department.

(1) The number of vehicles that will be selected for inspection by the department at a terminal shall be based on terminal fleet size and applied separately to a terminal fleet of power units and trailers, according to the following schedule:Fleet SizeRepresentative 
Sample 1 or 2All 3 to 8 3 9 to 15 416 to 25 626 to 50 951 to 90 1491 or more 20(2) The lessor of any vehicle described in subdivision (a) shall make vehicles available for inspection upon request of an authorized representative of the department in the course of inspecting the terminal of the lessee. This section does not affect whether the lessor or driver provided by the lessor is an employee of the authorized carrier lessee, and compliance with this section and its attendant administrative requirements does not imply an employee-employer relationship.

(c) (1) The department may inspect any terminal, as defined in Section 34515, of a motor carrier who, at any time, operates any vehicle described in subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall establish a performance-based truck terminal inspection selection priority system. In adopting the system’s rules, the department shall
 incorporate methodologies consistent with those used by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, including those related to the quantitative analysis of safety-related motor carrier performance data, collected during the course of inspection or enforcement contact by authorized representatives of the department or any authorized federal, state, or local safety official, in categories, including, but not limited to, driver fatigue, driver fitness, vehicle maintenance, and controlled substances and alcohol use. The department shall also incorporate other safety-related motor carrier performance data in this system, including citations and accident information. The department shall create a database to include all performance-based data specified in this section that shall be updated in a manner to provide real-time information to the department on motor carrier performance. The department shall prioritize for selection those motor carrier terminals never previously inspected by the department, those
 identified by the inspection priority selection system, and those terminals operating vehicles listed in subdivision (g) of Section 34500. The department is not required to inspect a terminal pursuant to this section after a terminal receives a satisfactory compliance rating as the result of a terminal inspection conducted by the department pursuant to this section or Section 34501, or if the department has not received notification by the system of a motor carrier operating while exceeding the threshold of the inspection selection priority system. Any motor carrier that is inspected and receives less than a satisfactory compliance rating, or that falls below the threshold of the selection priority system, shall be subject to periodic inquiries and inspections as outlined in subdivision (f), and these inquiries and inspections shall be based on the severity of the violations.

(3) As used in this section and Section 34505.6, subdivision (f) of
 Section 34500 includes only those combinations in which the gross vehicle weight rating of the towing vehicle exceeds 10,000 pounds, but does not include a pickup truck or any combination never operated in commercial use, and subdivision (g) of Section 34500 includes only those vehicles transporting hazardous material for which the display of placards is required pursuant to Section 27903, a license is required pursuant to Section 32000.5, or for which hazardous waste transporter registration is required pursuant to Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code. Notwithstanding Section 5014.1, vehicles that display special identification plates in accordance with Section 5011, historical vehicles, as described in Section 5004, implements of husbandry and farm vehicles, as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 36000) of Division 16, and vehicles owned or operated by an agency of the federal government are not subject to this section or Section 34505.6.

(d) It is unlawful for a motor carrier to operate, or cause to be operated, any vehicle that is subject to this section, Section 34520, or Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), unless the motor carrier is knowledgeable of, and in compliance with, all applicable statutes and regulations.

(e) It is unlawful for a motor carrier to contract or subcontract with, or otherwise engage the services of, another motor carrier, subject to this section, unless the contracted motor carrier has complied with subdivision (d). A motor carrier shall not contract or subcontract with, or otherwise engage the services of, another motor carrier until the contracted motor carrier provides certification of compliance with subdivision (d). This certification shall be completed in writing by the contracted motor carrier in a manner prescribed by the department. The certification, or a copy of the certification, shall be maintained by each involved
 party for the duration of the contract or the period of service plus two years, and shall be presented for inspection immediately upon the request of an authorized employee of the department. The certifications required by this subdivision and subdivision (b) of Section 34620 may be combined.

(f) (1) An inspected terminal that receives an unsatisfactory compliance rating shall be reinspected by the department within 120 days after the issuance of the unsatisfactory compliance rating.

(2) If a motor carrier’s Motor Carrier of Property Permit or Public Utilities Commission operating authority is suspended as a result of an unsatisfactory compliance rating, the department shall not conduct a reinspection for permit or authority reinstatement until requested to do so by the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Public Utilities Commission, as appropriate.

(g) A motor carrier issued an unsatisfactory terminal rating may request a review of the rating within five business days of receipt of the notification of the rating. The department shall conduct and evaluate the review within 10 business days of the request.

(h) The department shall publish performance-based inspection completion data and make the data available for public review.

(i) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Basic Inspection of Terminals program or BIT program.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031,
 and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 61, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.12.

(a) Vehicles and the operation thereof, subject to this section, are those described in subdivision (a), (b), (e), (f), (g), or (k) of Section 34500.

(b) It is unlawful for a motor carrier to operate any vehicle of a type described in subdivision (a) without identifying to the department all terminals, as defined in Section 34515, in this state where vehicles may be inspected by the department pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34501 and where vehicle
 inspection and maintenance records and driver records will be made available for inspection. Motor carriers shall make vehicles and records available for inspection upon request by an authorized representative of the department. If a motor carrier fails to provide vehicles and records, an unsatisfactory terminal rating shall be issued by the department.

(1) The number of vehicles that will be selected for inspection by the department at a terminal shall be based on terminal fleet size and applied separately to a terminal fleet of power units and trailers, according to the following schedule:Fleet SizeRepresentative
 
Sample 1 or 2All 3 to 8 3 9 to 15 416 to 25 626 to 50 951 to 90 1491 or more 20(2) The lessor of any vehicle described in subdivision (a) shall make vehicles available for inspection upon request of an authorized representative of the department in the course of inspecting the terminal of the lessee. This section does not affect whether the lessor or driver provided by the lessor is an employee of the authorized carrier lessee, and compliance with this section and its attendant administrative requirements does not imply
 an employee-employer relationship.

(c) (1) The department may inspect any terminal, as defined in Section 34515, of a motor carrier who, at any time, operates any
 vehicle described in subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall establish a performance-based truck terminal inspection selection priority system. In adopting the system’s rules, the department shall incorporate methodologies consistent with those used by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, including those related to the quantitative analysis of safety-related motor carrier performance data, collected during the course of inspection or enforcement contact by authorized representatives of the department or any authorized federal, state, or local safety official, in categories, including, but not limited to, driver fatigue, driver fitness, vehicle maintenance, and controlled substances and alcohol use. The department shall also incorporate other safety-related motor carrier performance data in this system, including
 citations and accident information. The department shall create a database to include all performance-based data specified in this section that shall be updated in a manner to provide real-time information to the department on motor carrier performance. The department shall prioritize for selection those motor carrier terminals never previously inspected by the department, those identified by the inspection priority selection system, and those terminals operating vehicles listed in subdivision (g) of Section 34500. The department is not required to inspect a terminal pursuant to this section after a terminal receives a satisfactory compliance rating as the result of a terminal inspection conducted by the department pursuant to this section or Section 34501, or if the department has not received notification by the system of a motor carrier operating while exceeding the threshold of the inspection
 selection priority system. Any motor carrier that is inspected and receives less than a satisfactory compliance rating, or that falls below the threshold of the selection priority system, shall be subject to periodic inquiries and inspections as outlined in subdivision (f), and these inquiries and inspections shall be based on the severity of the violations.

(3) As used in this section and Section 34505.6, subdivision (f) of Section 34500 includes only those combinations in which the gross vehicle weight rating of the towing vehicle exceeds 10,000 pounds, but does not include a pickup truck or any combination never operated in commercial use, and subdivision (g) of Section 34500 includes only those vehicles transporting hazardous material for which the display of placards is required pursuant to Section 27903, a license is required pursuant to
 Section 32000.5, or for which hazardous waste transporter registration is required pursuant to Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code. Notwithstanding Section 5014.1, vehicles that display special identification plates in accordance with Section 5011, historical vehicles, as described in Section 5004, implements of husbandry and farm vehicles, as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 36000) of Division 16 and vehicles owned or operated by an agency of the federal government are not subject to this section or Section 34505.6.

(d) It is unlawful for a motor carrier to operate, or cause to be operated, any vehicle that is subject to this section, Section 34520, or Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), unless the motor carrier is knowledgeable of, and in compliance with, all applicable statutes and regulations.

(e) It is unlawful for a motor carrier to contract or subcontract with, or otherwise engage the services of, another motor carrier, subject to this section, unless the contracted motor carrier has complied with subdivision (d). A motor carrier shall not contract or subcontract with, or otherwise engage the services of, another motor carrier until the contracted motor carrier provides certification of compliance with subdivision (d). This certification shall be completed in writing by the contracted motor carrier in a manner prescribed by the department. The certification, or a copy of the certification, shall be maintained by each involved party for the duration of the contract or the period of service plus two years, and shall be presented for inspection immediately upon the request of an authorized employee of the department. The
 certifications required by this subdivision and subdivision (b) of Section 34620 may be combined.

(f) (1) An inspected terminal that receives an unsatisfactory compliance rating shall be reinspected by the department within 120 days after the issuance of the unsatisfactory compliance rating.

(2) If a motor carrier’s Motor Carrier of Property Permit or Public Utilities Commission operating authority is suspended as a result of an unsatisfactory compliance rating, the department shall not conduct a reinspection for permit or authority reinstatement until requested to do so by the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Public Utilities Commission, as appropriate.

(g) A motor carrier issued an unsatisfactory
 terminal rating may request a review of the rating within five business days of receipt of the notification of the rating. The department shall conduct and evaluate the review within 10 business days of the request.

(h) The department shall publish performance-based inspection completion data and make the data available for public review.

(i) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Basic Inspection of Terminals program or BIT program.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2031.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 15) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.13.

If the inspection of a carrier facility, maintenance facility, or terminal of any person who operates a schoolbus results in an unsatisfactory terminal rating by the department, the department shall notify the school board of the district that is responsible for the terminal.
